Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5518.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1114. (1) Notwithstanding R 436.1403 and R 436.1503 of the Michigan administrative code Administrative Code and except as otherwise provided under this act or rule of the commission, an on-premises and an off-premises licensee shall not sell, give away, or furnish alcoholic liquor between the hours of 2 a.m. and 7 a.m. on any day. A licensee issued a license under section 507 may sell, give away, or furnish alcoholic liquor at any time on any day subject to the approval of the governing body of the applicable publicly owned airport. (2) Subsection (1) does not prevent any a local governmental unit from prohibiting the sale of beer and wine between the hours of 7 a.m. and 12 noon on Sunday or between the hours of 7 a.m. on Sunday and 2 a.m. on Monday under section 1111 and does not prevent any a local governmental unit from prohibiting the sale of spirits and mixed spirit drink between the hours of 7 a.m. and 12 noon on Sunday or between the hours of 7 a.m. on Sunday and 2 a.m. on Monday under section 1113. A licensee selling alcoholic liquor between 7 a.m. and 12 noon on Sunday shall obtain a permit and pay to the commission an annual fee of $160.00. (3) A reference to the time of day under this act or a rule of the commission includes daylight savings time, when observed.